Alabama, session 2026rs, HB516.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 41-5A-12.2 of the Code of Alabama
1975, is amended to read as follows:
"§41-5A-12.2
(a) After June 14, 2023, beginning after the close of
the then current fiscal year, any nonprofit Any corporation
organized under the laws of this state as a nonprofit
Page 1

organized under the laws of this state as a nonprofit
HB516 INTRODUCED
corporation that is not incorporated pursuant to Title 11,
which that provides water service to its members or the
public, may be audited or examined one time by the Department
of Examiners of Public Accounts in the same manner as provided
in Chapter 5A of Title 41. The department may charge a
reasonable fee for the audits.
(b) After June 14, 2023, beginning after the close of
the then current fiscal year, any nonprofit Any corporation
that is not incorporated pursuant to Title 11, whichthat
provides water service to its members or the public, may be
audited or examined one time in addition to the audit provided
in subsection (a) by the Department of Examiners of Public
Accounts in the same manner as provided in this chapter, if
the department suspects fraud or mismanagement of funds by the
nonprofit corporation. The department may charge a reasonable
fee for the audits or examinations.
(c) This section does not apply to or affect any public
water supply system, waterworks plant, or water distribution
system owned or operated by a municipality or county, or by a
public corporation, board, or other entity organized, created,
or incorporated pursuant to Title 11."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2